Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2436.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1203.1 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, added November 12, 2025 (P.L.244, No.47), is amended to read:Section 1203.1. State Certificate Fee Reduction.--Certificate fees assessed by the Department of Education related to the review of certificate eligibility for issuance of certificates under section 1201 may not be more than fifty dollars ($50). Except for professional educator discipline fees collected by the department, all certificate fees shall be deposited into the Talent Recruitment Account established under <--1234567891011121314151617181920 section 1505-K.SECTION 2. SECTION 1503-J(D) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:SECTION 1503-J. KEYSTONE TELEPRESENCE EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM.* * *(D) ALLOCATION.--TO AWARD GRANTS UNDER THE PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT [SHALL] MAY USE UP TO $300,000 ANNUALLY OF UNDISTRIBUTED FUNDS NOT EXPENDED, ENCUMBERED OR COMMITTED FROM APPROPRIATIONS FOR GRANTS AND SUBSIDIES MADE TO THE DEPARTMENT TO AWARD GRANTS. THE FUNDS SHALL BE TRANSFERRED BY THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET TO A RESTRICTED ACCOUNT AS NECESSARY TO AWARD GRANTS AND, WHEN TRANSFERRED, ARE APPROPRIATED TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE.* * *(F) TRANSFER.--THE SECRETARY OF THE BUDGET SHALL TRANSFER $1,394,560.19 FROM THE RESTRICTED ACCOUNT UNDER SUBSECTION (D) TO THE TALENT RECRUITMENT ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 1505-K(A).Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2436PN3374 - 2 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819